New Jersey, session 222, A1108.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Each animal or veterinary facility operating in the State shall register with the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners and shall be inspected by the board on an annual basis.  This annual inspection shall be in addition to, and the requirement for an annual inspection shall not be deemed to be satisfied by, any inspection conducted pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1978, c.73 (C.45:1-18). For the purposes of this section, animal or veterinary facility means an animal or veterinary facility as defined in section 1 of P.L.1983, c.98 (C.45:16-1.1). 2.    State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners may, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations as shall be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.